Washington statutes.
RCW 42.16.030

Disposition of fees.

All officers enumerated in *this section, who are paid a salary in lieu of fees, shall collect the fees herein prescribed for the use of the state or county, as the case may be, and shall pay the same into the state or county treasury, as the case may be, on the first Monday of each month.

[1907 c 56 s 1, part; RRS s 4217. Prior: 1903 c 151 s 1, part; 1893 c 130 s 1, part.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "this section" refers to 1907 c 56 s 1, of which RCW 42.16.030 is but a part. The other parts of 1907 c 56 s 1, as amended, are codified as RCW 2.32.070 (supreme court clerk's fees), 2.40.010 (witnesses' fees), 36.18.020 (superior court clerks' fees), 36.18.040 (sheriff's fees), 36.18.010 (county auditor's fees), 36.18.030 (county coroner's fees), 2.36.150 (jurors' fees), 3.16.100 (constables' fees), and 42.28.090 (notaries' fees).

Daily remittance of moneys to state treasury required: RCW 43.01.050.